Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Article 9. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 25.25.901.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this chapter, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995; am § 101 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, rewrote the section, which read, “This chapter shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting it.”

Sec. 25.25.902.
Severability.

Under AS

01.10.030

, if a provision of this chapter or its application to a person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995)

Sec. 25.25.903.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995)